Utah statutes.
38-2-1.   Lien on livestock -- For feed and care.
Every ranchman, farmer, agistor, herder of cattle, tavern keeper or livery
stable keeper to whom any domestic animals shall be entrusted for the purpose
of feeding, herding or pasturing shall have a lien upon such animals for the
amount that may be due him for such feeding, herding or pasturing, and is
authorized to retain possession of such animals until such amount is paid.
